Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 2
G

ROUND-WATER USE GENERALLY

Cross references.

- Powers and duties of department pertaining to protection of underground fresh water supplies against effects of deep drilling for oil and gas,

§

12-4-40

et seq.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Groundwater use, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-2.

Law reviews.

-
For article, "The Groundwater Use Act of 1972: Protection for Georgia's Groundwater Resource," see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 709 (1972). For article, "Georgia's Environmental Law: A Survey," see 23 Mercer L. Rev. 633 (1972). For article discussing regulation of selected activities to effect environmental planning, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 53 (1975). For article discussing legal questions relating to interbasin transfer of water supply, see 13 Ga. St. B.J. 48 (1976). For article, "Hazardous Waste Issues in Real Estate Transactions," see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 581 (1987).

12-5-90. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the "Ground-water Use Act of 1972."

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 976, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "Ground-water" was substituted for "Ground Water".

Law reviews.

-
For article, "Water Rights, Public Resources, and Private Commodities: Examining the Current and Future Law Governing the Allocation of Georgia Water," see 38 Ga. L. Rev. 1009 (2004). For article, "Special Challenges to Water Markets in Riparian States," see 21 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 305 (2004). For article, "Sharing Water Through Interbasin Transfer and Basis of Origin Protection in Georgia: Issues for Evaluation in Comprehensive State Water Planning for Georgia's Surface Water Rivers and Groundwater Aquifers," see 21 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 339 (2004).

12-5-91. Declaration of policy.

The general welfare and public interest require that the water resources of the state be put to beneficial use to the fullest extent to which they are capable, subject to reasonable regulation in order to conserve these resources and to provide and maintain conditions which are conducive to the development and use of water resources.

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 976, § 2.)

Law reviews.

-
For annual survey of local government law, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 267 (2006).

12-5-92. Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

"Aquifer" means a geologic formation, group of such formations, or a part of such a formation that is water-bearing.

"Area of the state" means any municipality or county or portion thereof or other substantial geographical area of the state as may be designated by the division.

"Consumptive use" means any use of water withdrawn from the ground other than a "nonconsumptive use," as defined in this part.

"Director" means the director, or his designee, of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Division" means the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

(5.1) "Farm uses" means irrigation of any land used for general farming, forage, aquaculture, pasture, turf production, orchards, or tree and ornamental nurseries; provisions of water supply for farm animals, poultry farming, or any other activity conducted in the course of a farming operation. Farm uses shall also include the processing of perishable agricultural products and the irrigation of recreational turf, except in Chatham, Effingham, Bryan, and Glynn counties, where irrigation of recreational turf shall not be considered a farm use.

"Ground water" means water of underground streams, channels, artesian basins, reservoirs, lakes, and other water under the surface of the earth, whether public or private, natural or artificial, which is contained within, flows through, or borders upon this state or any portion thereof, including those portions of the Atlantic Ocean over which this state has jurisdiction.

"Nonconsumptive use" means the use of water withdrawn from a ground-water system or aquifer in such a manner that it is returned to the ground-water system or aquifer from which it was withdrawn without substantial diminution in quantity or substantial impairment in quality at or near the point from which it was withdrawn, provided that in determining whether a use of ground water is nonconsumptive, the division may take into consideration whether any material injury or detriment to other water users of the area, by reason of reduction of water pressure in the aquifer or system, has not been adequately compensated by the permit applicant who caused or substantially contributed to such injury or detriment.

"Person" means any and all persons, including individuals, firms, partnerships, associations, public or private institutions, municipalities or political subdivisions, governmental agencies, or private or public corporations organized under the laws of this state or any other state or country.

"Well" means any excavation that is cored, bored, drilled, jetted, dug, or otherwise constructed for the purpose of locating, testing, or withdrawing ground water, or for the purpose of evaluating, testing, developing, draining, or recharging any ground-water reservoirs or aquifer, or any excavation that may control, divert, or otherwise cause the movement of water from or into any aquifer, provided that this shall not include a well constructed by an individual on land which is owned or leased by him, appurtenant to a single-family dwelling, and intended for domestic use, including household purposes, farm livestock, or gardens.

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 976, § 3; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1273, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 12; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1694, §§ 2, 3.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "single-family dwelling" was substituted for "single family dwelling" in paragraph (9).

12-5-93. Power of director to employ personnel.

The director is authorized to employ, on a full-time or part-time basis, such professional personnel and clerical or other employees as may be necessary to discharge the additional duties delegated to the division by this part.

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 976, § 14.)

12-5-94. Adoption of rules and regulations by Board of Natural Resources.

The Board of Natural Resources may adopt and modify from time to time rules and regulations to implement this part.

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 976, § 11.)

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Groundwater use, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-2.

12-5-95. Proposed regulations regarding ground-water use; hearings; adoption and modification of regulations; contesting validity of regulations.

The Board of Natural Resources shall prepare proposed regulations to be applied, containing such of the following provisions as the board finds appropriate concerning the use of ground waters:

Provisions requiring water users within the area to submit reports not more frequently than at 30 day intervals concerning quantity of water used or withdrawn, sources of water, and the nature of the use thereof;

With respect to ground waters, provisions concerning the timing of withdrawals, provisions to protect against or abate salt-water encroachment, and provisions to protect against or abate unreasonable adverse effects on other water users within the area, including but not limited to adverse effects on public use;

With respect to ground waters, provisions concerning well depth and spacing controls, and provisions establishing a range of prescribed pumping levels (elevations below which water may not be pumped) or maximum pumping rates, or both, in wells or for the aquifer or for any part thereof based on the capacities and characteristics of the aquifer;

Such other provisions not inconsistent with this part as the Board of Natural Resources finds necessary to implement the purposes of this part.

The Board of Natural Resources shall conduct one or more hearings upon the proposed regulations, in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act." Upon completion of the hearings and consideration of submitted evidence and arguments with respect to any proposed regulation, the board shall adopt its final action with respect thereto, and shall publish such final action as part of its official regulations. The board is empowered to modify or revoke from time to time any final action previously taken by it pursuant to this Code section, any such modifications or revocations, however, to be subject to the procedural requirements of this part, including notice and hearing.

Any person wishing to contest the validity of a regulation may file for a declaratory judgment as provided for by Code Section 50-13-10.

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 976, § 5; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1273, §§ 5-9.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, a misspelling of "aquifer" was corrected in paragraph (a)(3).

12-5-96. Regulated reasonable use of ground water for general use; permits to withdraw, obtain, or utilize; coordination with water plans; appeal procedures.

No person shall withdraw, obtain, or utilize ground waters in excess of 100,000 gallons per day for any purpose unless such person shall first obtain a permit therefor from the division.

Any person applying for a permit or a permit modification under this part which indicates an increase in water usage, except for permits for solely agricultural usage, shall also submit with such application a water conservation plan approved by the director and based on guidelines issued by the director. The director shall collect and disseminate such technical information as the director deems appropriate to assist in the preparation of water conservation plans.

When sufficient evidence is provided by the applicant that the water withdrawn or used from the ground is not consumptively used, a permit therefor shall be issued by the division without a hearing and without the conditions provided in subsection (c) of this Code section. Applications for such permits shall set forth such facts as the division shall deem necessary to enable it to establish and maintain adequate records of all water uses.

In all cases in which sufficient evidence of a nonconsumptive use is not presented by the applicant, the division shall notify the applicant of the division's proposed action concerning such permit and shall transmit with such notice a copy of any permit it proposes to issue to the applicant, which permit will become final unless a request for a hearing is made within 30 days from the date of service of such notice. The division shall have the power:

To grant such permit with such conditions as the division deems necessary to implement the regulations adopted pursuant to Code Section 12-5-95;

To grant any temporary permit for such period of time as the division shall specify where conditions make such temporary permit essential, even though the action allowed by such permit may not be consistent with the regulations of the Board of Natural Resources;

To modify or revoke any permit upon not less than 60 days' written notice to any person affected;

To deny such permit if the application therefor or the effect of the water use proposed or described therein upon the water resources of the area is found to be contrary to public interest. Any water user wishing to contest the proposed action shall be entitled to a hearing upon request therefor.

In adopting any regulations pursuant to Code Section 12-5-95 and in considering permit applications, revocations, or modifications under this Code section, the Board of Natural Resources or the division shall consider:

The number of persons using an aquifer and the object, extent, and necessity of their respective withdrawals or uses;

The nature and size of the aquifer;

The physical and chemical nature of any impairment of the aquifer adversely affecting its availability or fitness for other water uses, including public use;

The probable severity and duration of such impairment under foreseeable conditions;

The injury to public health, safety, or welfare which would result if such impairment were not prevented or abated;

The kinds of businesses or activities to which the various uses are related;

The importance and necessity of the uses, including farm uses, claimed by permit applicants under this Code section, or of the water uses of the area under Code Section 12-5-95, and the extent of any injury or detriment caused or expected to be caused to other water uses, including public use;

Diversion from or reduction of flows in other watercourses or aquifers in accordance with Article 8 of this chapter or any state-wide water plan provided pursuant thereto; and

Any other relevant factors.

Regional water development and conservation plans for the state's major aquifers or any portion thereof shall be developed in accordance with Article 8 of this chapter. Such plans shall include water development, conservation, and sustainable use and shall be based on detailed scientific analysis of the aquifer, the projected future condition of the aquifer, and current demand and estimated future demands on the aquifer, in accordance with Article 8 of this chapter. Such plans shall serve to promote the conservation and reuse of water within the state, guard against a shortage of water within the state and each region, and promote the efficient use of the water resource and shall be consistent with the general welfare and public interest of the state as provided in Code Section 12-5-91, in accordance with Article 8 of this chapter. Upon adoption of a regional plan, all permits issued by the division shall be consistent with such plan. The term of any permit and all provisions of any permit for which an application for renewal is made prior to the completion of any regional plan shall be extended at least until the completion of such plan. Applications for new permits shall be subject to review by the division, and the division may issue such permits as appropriate pending completion of a regional plan.

The division shall give notice of all its official acts which have or are intended to have general application and effect to all persons on its mailing list on the date when such action is taken. It shall be the duty of the division to keep such a mailing list on which it shall record the name and address of each person who requests a listing thereon, together with the date of receipt of such request. Any person may, by written request to the division, ask to be permanently recorded on such a mailing list.

Any hearing pursuant to this Code section shall be held in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 12-2-2 and also, for the purposes of this part, shall be specifically subject to subsection (a) of Code Section 50-13-19.

Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 12-5-102 for emergency orders, any person who is aggrieved or adversely affected by any order or action of the director pursuant to this Code section shall, upon petition within 30 days after the issuance of such order or the taking of such action, have a right to a hearing before an administrative law judge appointed by the Board of Natural Resources. The hearing before the administrative law judge shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act," and the rules and regulations adopted by the board pursuant thereto. Any administrative law judge so appointed by the board shall fully meet and qualify as to all applicable conflict of interest requirements provided for in Section 304(h)(2)(D) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972, as amended, and the rules, regulations, and guidelines promulgated thereunder. The decision of the administrative law judge shall constitute the final decision of the board. Any party to the hearing, including the director, shall have a right of judicial review thereof in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, including the right to seek judicial review in the superior court in the county of the applicant's or permittee's residence. For the purposes of this part, such review is also specifically subject to subsection (a) of Code Section 50-13-19.

Persons are "aggrieved or adversely affected" where the challenged action has caused or will cause them injury in fact and where the injury is to an interest within the zone of interests to be protected or regulated by the statutes that the director is empowered to administer and enforce. In the event the director asserts in response to the petition before the administrative law judge that the petitioner is not aggrieved or adversely affected, the administrative law judge shall take evidence and hear arguments on this issue and thereafter make a ruling on this issue before continuing with the hearing. The burden of going forward with evidence on this issue shall rest with the petitioner.

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 976, § 6; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1273, §§ 10-15; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1694, §§ 4, 5; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 1994, p. 863, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 706, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 2007, p. 739, § 4/SB 200; Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 4-3/SB 342.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, "aquifer" was substituted for "acquifer" in paragraph (d)(3).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2007, p. 739,

§

5/SB 200, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the 2007 amendment shall only become effective on January 1, 2009, upon the ratification of a resolution at the November, 2008, state-wide general election that amends the Constitution so as to authorize the General Assembly to provide by general law for the creation and comprehensive regulation of infrastructure development districts. If such resolution is not so ratified, this Act shall not become effective and shall stand repealed in its entirety on January 1, 2009. The constitutional amendment proposed in Ga. L. 2007, p. 775, was defeated in the general election on November 4, 2008.

Law reviews.

-
For survey article on environment, natural resources, and land use, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 145 (1982). For article, "Water Rights, Public Resources, and Private Commodities: Examining the Current and Future Law Governing the Allocation of Georgia Water," see 38 Ga. L. Rev. 1009 (2004).
For note, "The Problem of Reallocation in a Regulated Riparian System: Examining the Law in Georgia," see 40 Ga. L. Rev. 207 (2005).
For note on 2007 amendment of this Code section, see 24 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 255 (2007).

12-5-97. Duration of permits; renewal; transfer; certified statements by holders; monitoring water use; granting permit to person withdrawing ground water prior to July 1, 1973; prior investments in land and nature of plans for water use; continued withdrawal pending decision on permit.

Except for applications filed pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 12-5-105, permits under Code Section 12-5-96 may be granted for any period of time not less than ten years, unless the applicant requests a shorter period of time, nor more than 50 years. The director may base the duration of such permits on any reasonable system of classification based upon but not necessarily limited to such factors as source of supply and type of use. In evaluating any application for a permit for the use of water for a period of 25 years or more, the director shall evaluate the condition of the water supply to assure that the supply is adequate to meet the multiple needs of the citizens of the state as can reasonably be projected for the term of the permit and ensure that the issuance of such permit is based upon a water development and conservation plan for the applicant or for the region. Such regional plan shall promote the conservation and reuse of water within the state, guard against a shortage of water within the state, promote the efficient use of the water resource, and be consistent with the public welfare of the state. The board shall promulgate regulations for implementation of this subsection, including provisions for review of such permits periodically or upon a substantial reduction in average annual volume of the water resource which adversely affects water supplies to determine that the permittee continues in compliance with the conditions of the permit. In the event the director determines that a regional plan is required in connection with any application for a permit for the use of water for a period of 25 years or more, the division or a person or entity designated by the division shall develop a plan as provided in subsection (e) of Code Section 12-5-96.

Permits may be renewed at any time within six months prior to the date of their expiration upon compliance with Code Section 12-5-96.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 12-5-105, permits shall not be transferred except with the approval of the division.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 12-5-105, every person who is required by this part to secure a permit shall file with the division, in the manner prescribed by the division, a certified statement of quantities of water used and withdrawn, sources of water, and the nature of the use thereof not more frequently than at 30 day intervals. Such statements shall be filed on forms furnished by the division within 90 days after the issuance of regulations. Water users not required to secure a permit shall comply with procedures established to protect and manage the water resources of the state. Such procedures shall be within the provisions of this part and shall be adopted after public hearing. The requirements embodied in the two preceding sentences shall not apply to individual domestic water use.

If any person who is required to secure a permit under this part is unable to furnish accurate information concerning amounts of water being withdrawn or used, or if there is evidence that his certified statement is false or inaccurate or that he is withdrawing or using a larger quantity of water or under different conditions than has been authorized by the division, the division shall have the authority to require such person to install water meters or some other more economical means for measuring water use acceptable to the division. In determining the amount of water being withdrawn or used by a permit holder or applicant, the division may use the rated capacity of his pumps, the rated capacity of his cooling system, data furnished by the applicant, or the standards or methods employed by the United States Geological Survey in determining such quantities or by any other accepted method.

In any case where a permit applicant can prove to the division's satisfaction that the applicant was withdrawing or using water prior to July 1, 1973, the division shall take into consideration the extent to which any uses or withdrawals were reasonably necessary, in the judgment of the division, to meet his needs and shall grant a permit which shall meet those reasonable needs; provided, however, that the granting of such permit shall not have unreasonably adverse effects upon other water uses in the area, including public use, and including potential as well as present use.

The division shall also take into consideration in the granting of any permit the prior investments of any person in lands and the nature of any plans for the usage of water in connection with such lands, which plans have been submitted to the division within a reasonable time after July 1, 1973, or, if for farm uses, after July 1, 1988; provided, however, that the granting of such permit shall not have unreasonably adverse effects upon other water uses in the area, including public use, and including potential as well as present use.

Pending the issuance or denial of a permit pursuant to subsection (f) or (g) of this Code section, the applicant may continue the same withdrawal or use which existed prior to July 1, 1973.

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 976, § 7; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1273, §§ 16-20; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1694, § 6; Ga. L. 1995, p. 706, § 5; Ga. L. 2018, p. 974, § 3/SB 451.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, "The" was deleted following "July 1, 1973, the" in subsection (f).

Law reviews.

-
For note, "The Problem of Reallocation in a Regulated Riparian System: Examining the Law in Georgia," see 40 Ga. L. Rev. 207 (2005).

12-5-98. Investigations; entry; protection of confidential information or trade secrets; refusing entry or access to and interference with authorized representatives of division.

The division shall have the right to conduct such investigations as may reasonably be necessary to carry out its duties prescribed in this part and for this purpose to enter at reasonable times any property, public or private, for the purpose of investigating the condition, withdrawal, or use of any waters, investigating water sources, or investigating the installation or operation of any well, and to require written statements or the filing of reports under oath, with respect to pertinent questions relating to the installation or operation of any well, provided that no person shall be required to disclose any secret formula, processes, or methods used in any manufacturing operation or any confidential information concerning business activities carried on by him or under his supervision.

No person shall refuse entry or access to any authorized representative of the division who requests entry for the purposes of a lawful inspection and who presents appropriate credentials, nor shall any person obstruct, hamper, or interfere with any such representative while in the process of carrying out his official duties consistent with the provisions of this part.

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 976, § 10.)

12-5-99. Order by director after failure of conference, conciliation, or persuasion; hearings; appeal.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that a violation of any provision of this part or any rule or regulation of the Board of Natural Resources adopted pursuant to this part has occurred, he shall attempt to obtain a remedy with the violator or violators by conference, conciliation, or persuasion.

In the case of failure of such conference, conciliation, or persuasion to effect a remedy to such violation, the director may issue an order directed to such violator or violators. The order shall specify the provisions of the part or rule or regulation alleged to have been violated and shall order that necessary corrective action be taken within a reasonable time to be prescribed in such order. Any order issued by the director under this part shall be signed by the director. Any such order shall become final unless the person or persons named therein request in writing a hearing before the director no later than 30 days after such order is served on such person or persons.

Appeals from this order shall be in compliance with subsection (c) of Code Section 12-2-2, and also, for the purposes of this part, shall be specifically subject to subsection (a) of Code Section 50-13-19.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 1273, § 21.)

12-5-100. Judgment in accordance with director's order.

The director may file in the superior court of the county wherein the person under order resides, or if the person is a corporation, in the county wherein the corporation maintains its principal place of business, or if the person is a nonresident of this state, in the superior court of the county wherein the violation occurred, a certified copy of a final order of the director unappealed from, or of a final order of the director affirmed upon appeal, whereupon the court shall render judgment in accordance therewith and notify the parties. Such judgment shall have the same effect, and all proceedings in relation thereto shall thereafter be the same, as though the judgment had been rendered in an action duly heard and determined by such court.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 1243, § 21.)

12-5-101. Injunctive relief.

Whenever, in the judgment of the director, any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice which constitutes or will constitute any violation of this part, the director may make application to the superior court of the county where such person resides, or if the person is a nonresident of this state, then to the superior court of the county where such person is engaged in or is about to engage in any such act or practice, for an order enjoining and restraining such act or practice, and, upon a showing by the director that such person has engaged in or is about to engage in any such act or practice, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order shall be granted without the necessity of showing a lack of adequate remedy at law.

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 976, § 8; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1273, § 22.)

12-5-102. Emergency orders; restrictions; hearing; appeal; use by certain entities.

After receipt of affidavits or other sworn statements from persons setting forth an emergency situation requiring immediate action to protect the public health or welfare, and after the division finds that such an emergency exists requiring immediate action to protect the public health or welfare, the division may, without notice or hearing, issue an order reciting the existence of such an emergency and requiring that such action be taken as the division deems necessary to meet the emergency. Such order shall, except as to farm uses, be effective immediately, and any person to whom such order is directed shall comply therewith immediately but, on application to the division, shall be afforded a hearing within five days from the day on which the order is issued. On the basis of such hearing, the division shall continue such order in effect, revoke it, or modify it.

Any appeal from such order shall be in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 12-2-2, and, for the purposes of this part, shall be specifically subject to subsection (a) of Code Section 50-13-19, except that the initial hearing shall be within five days from the date on which the order was issued. Farm use permittees may continue to make use of water to their permitted capacity during the appeal process, but failure to timely request a hearing shall waive such right.

During emergency periods of water shortage, the director shall give first priority to providing water for human consumption and second priority to farm use.

The importance and necessity of water for industrial purposes are in no way modified or diminished by this Code section.

The use of ground water by any permanent facility car wash shall be deemed not to be outdoor water use for purposes of any outdoor watering restrictions if the facility:

Is connected to a sanitary sewer system of a political subdivision or local government authority or recycles used wash water; and

Is certified by the division as meeting or exceeding applicable best management practices for car washing facilities, which the Board of Natural Resources shall provide by rules and regulations not later than October 1, 2008. Such certification shall expire annually and may be issued or renewed upon compliance with such best management practices and payment of a $50.00 fee to the division. The provisions of this paragraph shall apply on and after the effective date of such board rules and regulations.

The use of ground water for any swimming pool shall be deemed not to be outdoor water use for purposes of any outdoor watering restrictions if failure to maintain the swimming pool would create unsafe, unsanitary, or unhealthy conditions affecting the public health or welfare.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 1273, § 24; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1694, § 7; Ga. L. 2008, p. 322, § 2/SB 466; Ga. L. 2008, p. 814, § 3/HB 1281.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, subsection (e), as enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 814,

§

3/HB 1281, was redesignated as subsection (f).

The enactment of subsection (f) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2008, p. 322,

§

2/SB 466, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2008, p. 814,

§

3/HB 1281. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921).

12-5-103. Representation of department by Attorney General.

It shall be the duty of the Attorney General to represent the department and its agents or designate some member of his staff to represent them in all actions in connection with this part.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 1273, § 25.)

Cross references.

- Attorney General, T. 45, C. 15, A. 1.

12-5-104. Effect of part on other laws.

Nothing contained in this part shall change or modify existing common or statutory law with respect to the rights of the use of surface water in this state.

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 976, § 12.)